California statutes. Elections Code
 in that language. The voter shall receive the facsimile copy of the ballot before vote centers open pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 4005. The facsimile copy of the ballot shall be sufficiently distinct in appearance from a regular ballot to prevent voters from attempting to vote on the facsimile copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

For any election conducted pursuant to Section 4005, the county elections official shall make a reasonable effort to inform a voter of either of the following:

(a) If the voter’s vote by mail ballot envelope is missing a signature.

(b) How the voter can correct the missing signature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 832, Sec. 4.   (SB 450)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

(a) The Secretary of State shall establish a taskforce that includes representatives of all of the following:

(1) County elections officials.

(2) Individuals with demonstrated language accessibility experience for languages covered under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.).

(3) The disability community and community organizations and individuals that advocate on behalf of, or provide services to, individuals with disabilities.

(4) Experts with
 demonstrated experience in the field of elections.

(b) The taskforce shall review elections conducted pursuant to Section 4005 and provide comments and recommendations to the Legislature within six months of each election conducted pursuant to Section 4005. The report required by this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 480, Sec. 3.   (SB 1450)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Conduct of Mail Ballot Elections [4100. - 4108.]

4100.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, mail ballot elections shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 3.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

Notwithstanding Sections 13300 and 13303, the elections official shall not commence to mail the combined county voter information guide and mail ballot before the 29th day before the election and shall complete the mailing by the 10th day before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 16.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

The elections official may include in the mailings set forth in Section 4101 a printed notice to the voters informing the voters that they may return the voted ballot by certified or registered mail.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3020, ballots cast under this chapter shall be returned to the elections official from whom they were obtained no later than 8 p.m. on election day.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any vote by mail ballot cast under this chapter shall be timely cast if it is received by the voter’s elections official via the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company no later than seven days after election day and either of the following is satisfied:

(1) The ballot is postmarked on or before election day or is time stamped or date stamped by a bona fide private mail delivery company on
 or before election day, or it is otherwise indicated by the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company that the ballot was mailed on or before election day.

(2) If the ballot has no postmark, a postmark with no date, or an illegible postmark, and no other information is available from the United States Postal Service or the bona fide private mail delivery company to indicate the date on which the ballot was mailed, the vote by mail ballot identification envelope is date stamped by the elections official upon receipt of the vote by mail ballot from the United States Postal Service or a bona fide private mail delivery company, and is signed and dated pursuant to Section 3011 on or before election day.

(c) For purposes of this section, “bona fide private mail
 delivery company” means a courier service that is in the regular business of accepting a mail item, package, or parcel for the purpose of delivery to a person or entity whose address is specified on the item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   (AB 930)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

(a) At the first general district election conducted by all-mailed ballot the following question shall be printed on the ballot and boxes shall be provided for the voter to indicate “Yes” or “No”:“SHALL THE MAILED BALLOT BE USED TO CONDUCT ALL FUTURE GENERAL DISTRICT ELECTIONS?”

(b) If the majority of the voters favor the all-mailed ballot election it shall be adopted as the procedure for conducting future general district elections. If the question is rejected by the voters it may be resubmitted at any subsequent general district election in the manner provided for in Section 4105.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

The question set forth in Section 4104, as to whether an all-mailed ballot election is required to be used in the conduct of all future general district elections, shall be printed on the ballot of any general district election upon (a) the adoption of an appropriate resolution by the governing board, or (b) upon the submission of an initiative petition to the governing board signed by voters not less in number than 10 percent of the voters in the district pursuant to the procedure set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 9300) of Division 9.

This section shall apply only to those districts in which an election by all-mailed ballots was conducted pursuant to a resolution adopted by the governing board of the district in the manner provided for by Section 4108.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a governing board in the County of San Diego may adopt a resolution requiring its general district election to be held on the same day as the statewide direct primary election or the day of the statewide general election.

(b) If an election is held pursuant to subdivision (a), and the election is consolidated with another election, Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 shall govern the consolidation and, if the county elections official is requested to conduct the election, Section 10002 shall apply to that election.

(c) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), a general district election is held on the same day as a statewide election, those officers whose four-year terms of office would have, prior to the adoption of the resolution, expired on the first Friday in December following the general district election in an odd-numbered year shall, instead, either continue in their offices until no later than the fourth Tuesday after the day of the general district election or, at the option of the governing board, cease to hold office prior to the expiration of their four-year term and upon the qualification of their successors at the time prescribed by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the governing board of the Marina County Water District in the County of Monterey may adopt a resolution requiring its general district election to be held on the same day as the statewide direct primary election or the day of the statewide general election.

(b) If an election is held pursuant to subdivision (a), and the election is consolidated with another election, Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 shall govern the consolidation, and, if the county elections official is requested to conduct the election, Section 10002 shall apply to that election.

(c) If, pursuant to subdivision (a), a general district election is held on the same day as a statewide election, those officers whose four-year terms of office would have, prior to the adoption of the resolution, expired on the first Friday in December following the general district election in an odd-numbered year shall, instead, either continue in their offices until no later than the fourth Tuesday after the day of the general district election or, at the option of the governing board, cease to hold office prior to the expiration of their four-year term and upon the qualification of their successors at the time prescribed by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and regardless of the number of eligible voters within its boundaries a district may, by resolution of its governing board, conduct any election by all-mailed ballots pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 4000).

(b) (1) A district conducting an election by all-mailed ballots may consolidate its election with the election of one or more other
 legislative or congressional districts, public districts, cities, counties, or other political subdivisions if all of the elections to be consolidated will be:

(A) Held on the same day.

(B) Held in the same territory or in a territory that is in part the same.

(C) Conducted wholly by mail.

(2) A district consolidating its election pursuant to subdivision (a) shall order the consolidation pursuant to Section 10400.

(3) A district election that is consolidated with an all-mailed ballot election for a legislative or congressional
 district shall also comply with any additional statutory requirements that apply to the all-mailed ballot election for that legislative or congressional district.

(c) An election conducted pursuant to this section shall be held on a date prescribed in Section 1500 or on any other date other than an established election date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 731, Sec. 3.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. POLITICAL PARTY QUALIFICATIONS [5000. - 5200.]



CHAPTER 1. New Party Qualifications [5000. - 5006.]

5000.

(a) For purposes of this division, the definition of “party” in Section 338 is applicable.

(b) This chapter shall apply to political bodies and to parties not otherwise provided for in Division 7 (commencing with Section 7050).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

Whenever a group of electors desires to qualify a new political party meeting the requirements of Section 5100 or 5151, that group shall form a political body by:

(a) Holding a caucus or convention at which temporary officers shall be elected and a party name designated. The designated name shall not be so similar to the name of an existing party so as to mislead the voters, and shall not conflict with that of any existing party or political body that has previously filed notice pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Filing formal notice with the Secretary of State that the political body has organized, elected temporary officers, and declared an intent to qualify a political party
 pursuant to either Section 5100 or 5151, but not both. The notice shall include the names and addresses of the temporary officers of the political body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 50.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

Upon receipt of the notice specified in Section 5001, the Secretary of State shall notify each county elections official of the name of the political body, its intent to qualify as a political party, and whether it intends to qualify for the next primary election or for the next presidential general election.

In preparing the statement of voters and their political affiliations, the county elections officials shall tabulate by political affiliation the affidavits of registration of members of political parties qualified pursuant to Section 5100 or 5151, and political bodies formally declaring an intent to qualify as political parties pursuant to Section 5001. All other affidavits of registration, except those of persons
 declining to state a political affiliation, shall be tabulated as miscellaneous registrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 5.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

A political body within the first 70 days after filing the formal notice required by Section 5001 is entitled, upon request to the Secretary of State, to have counted toward its qualification as a political party affidavits of registration in which voters declared affiliation with the political body prior to the date the political body filed the formal notice with the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

(a) If by the 135th day before any primary election, a political body filing notice of its intent to qualify for a primary election pursuant to Section 5001 has not qualified as a political party pursuant to Section 5100, the political body shall be considered to have abandoned its attempt to qualify as a political party and shall be ineligible to participate in the following primary election.

(b) If by the 102nd day before a presidential general election, a political body filing notice of its intent to qualify for a presidential general election pursuant to Section 5001 has not qualified as a political party pursuant to Section 5151, the political body shall be considered to have
 abandoned its attempt to qualify as a political party and shall be ineligible to participate in the following presidential general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 6.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

(a) Until otherwise provided for by statute, a political party newly qualified pursuant to Section 5100 shall carry on its activities in accordance with procedures applicable to any other political party that has detailed statutory provisions applicable to its operation as shall be designated by the newly qualified party. The temporary officers of the newly qualified political party elected pursuant to Section 5001 shall file notice of its selection with the Secretary of State not later than 30 days after the political party qualifies.

(b) Until otherwise provided for by statute, a political party newly qualified pursuant to Section 5151 shall carry on its activities in accordance
 with procedures applicable to any other political party that has detailed statutory provisions applicable to its operation as shall be designated by the newly qualified party, except that the newly qualified party shall not be required to use a primary election to nominate candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States prior to the presidential general election at which the party qualifies to participate, whose names shall appear on the presidential general election ballot. The temporary officers of the newly qualified political party elected pursuant to Section 5001 shall file notice of its selection with the Secretary of State not later than 30 days after the political party qualifies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 7.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

Any political party newly qualifying pursuant to Section 5100 shall conduct its presidential primary election in accordance with procedures applicable to any other political party that has detailed statutory provisions applicable to its presidential primary as shall be designated by the newly qualified party.

If a newly qualified political party has not elected permanent officers, the temporary officers shall notify the Secretary of State of the designated procedures the party has selected for its presidential primary, on or before the 125th day before the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Parties Qualified to Participate in the Primary Election [5100. - 5102.]

5100.

A party is qualified to participate in a primary election under any of the following conditions:

(a) (1) At the last preceding gubernatorial primary election, the sum of the votes cast for all of the candidates for an office voted on throughout the state who disclosed a preference for that party on the ballot was at least 2 percent of the entire vote of the state for that office.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a party may inform the Secretary of State that it declines to have the votes cast for a candidate who has disclosed that party as the candidate’s party preference on the ballot counted toward the 2-percent
 qualification
 threshold. If the party wishes to have votes for a candidate not counted in support of its qualification under paragraph (1), the party shall notify the secretary in writing of that candidate’s name by the seventh day before the gubernatorial primary election.

(b) (1) On or before the 135th day before a primary election, it appears to the Secretary of State, as a result of examining and totaling the statement of voters and their declared political preference transmitted to the Secretary of State by the county elections officials, that voters equal in number to at least 0.33 percent of the total number of voters registered on the 154th day before the primary election have declared their preference for that party.

(2) A person whose party preference
 is designated as “Unknown” pursuant to Section 2154 or 2267 shall not be counted for purposes of determining the total number of voters registered on the specified day preceding the election under paragraph (1).

(c) On or before the 135th day before a primary election, there is filed with the Secretary of State a petition signed by voters, equal in number to at least 10 percent of the entire vote of the state at the last preceding gubernatorial election, declaring that they represent a proposed party, the name of which shall be stated in the petition, which proposed party those voters desire to have participate in that primary election. This petition shall be circulated, signed, and verified, and the signatures of the voters on it shall be certified to and transmitted to the Secretary of State by the county elections officials substantially
 as provided for initiative petitions. Each page of the petition shall bear a caption in 18-point boldface type, which caption shall be the name of the proposed party followed by the words “Petition to participate in the primary election.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 314, Sec. 17.   (AB 796)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.5.

(a) Upon the occurrence of the gubernatorial election, each party shall have its qualifications reviewed by the Secretary of State. A party that does not meet the standards for qualification set forth in Section 5100 shall be prohibited from participating in any primary election. A party shall maintain its qualification to participate in any subsequent primary election by complying with any of the conditions specified in Section 5100.

(b) A party seeking qualification under provisions of this section and subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 5100 shall file formal notice with the Secretary of State that the party intends to regain qualification.

(c) Unless formal notice as required in subdivision (b) is timely received by the Secretary of State, he or she may have the name of the party omitted from any list, notice, ballot, or other publication containing the names of the parties qualified or seeking qualification that the Secretary of State may cause to be printed or published.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8001, this section shall only be applicable to a party that has successfully obtained that status for the first time after having been a political body, and shall not apply to a political party that has been disqualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1081, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

Whenever the registration of any party that qualified in the previous direct primary election falls below one-fifteenth of 1 percent of the total state registration, that party shall not be qualified to participate in the primary election but shall be deemed to have been abandoned by the voters. The Secretary of State shall immediately remove the name of the party from any list, notice, ballot, or other publication containing the names of the parties qualified to participate in the primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

No party shall be recognized or qualified to participate in any primary election that either directly or indirectly carries on, advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets the overthrow by any unlawful means of, or that directly or indirectly carries on, advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets a program of sabotage, force and violence, sedition or treason against, the government of the United States or of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Parties Qualified to Participate in the Presidential General Election [5150. - 5154.]

5150.

This chapter applies to a political body that did not qualify to participate in a presidential primary election pursuant to Section 5100 but nevertheless seeks qualification to participate in the following presidential general election through the nomination of candidates for President and Vice President of the United States by nominating convention, or some means other than a primary election, to appear on the ballot at the presidential general election. For purposes of this chapter, participating in a presidential general election does not include using the general election ballot for the purpose of electing state party or county central committee officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 8.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

A party is qualified to participate in a presidential general election under any of the following conditions:

(a) The party qualified to participate and participated in the presidential primary election preceding the presidential general election pursuant to Section 5100.

(b) (1) At the last preceding gubernatorial primary election, the sum of the votes cast for all of the candidates for an office voted on throughout the state who disclosed a preference for that party on the ballot was at least 2 percent of the entire vote of the state for that office.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a party
 may inform the Secretary of State that it declines to have the votes cast for a candidate who has disclosed that party as his or her party preference on the ballot counted toward the 2-percent qualification threshold. If the party wishes to have votes for a candidate not counted in support of its qualification under paragraph (1), the party shall notify the secretary in writing of that candidate’s name by the seventh day before the gubernatorial primary election.

(c) (1) If on or before the 102nd day before a presidential general election, it appears to the Secretary of State, as a result of examining and totaling the statement of voters and their declared political preference transmitted to him or her by the county elections officials, that voters equal in number to at least 0.33 percent of the total number of voters registered on the 123rd day before the presidential general election have declared their preference for
 that party.

(2) A person whose party preference is designated as “Unknown” pursuant to Section 2154 or 2265 shall not be counted for purposes of determining the total number of voters registered on the specified day preceding the election under paragraph (1).

(d) On or before the 135th day before a presidential general election, there is filed with the Secretary of State a petition signed by voters, equal in number to at least 10 percent of the entire vote of the state at the last preceding gubernatorial election, declaring that they represent a proposed party, the name of which shall be stated in the petition, which proposed party those voters desire to have participate in that presidential general election. This petition shall be circulated, signed, and verified, and the signatures of the voters on it shall be certified to and transmitted to the Secretary of State by the county
 elections officials substantially as provided for initiative petitions. Each page of the petition shall bear a caption in 18-point boldface type, which caption shall be the name of the proposed party followed by the words “Petition to participate in the presidential general election.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 57.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

(a) Upon the occurrence of the gubernatorial election, each party shall have its qualifications reviewed by the Secretary of State. A party that does not meet the standards for qualification set forth in Section 5151 shall be prohibited from participating in the presidential general election. A party shall maintain its qualification to participate in any subsequent presidential general election by complying with any of the conditions specified in Section 5151.

(b) A party seeking qualification under provisions of this section and subdivision (c) or (d) of Section 5151 shall file formal notice with the Secretary of State that the party intends to regain qualification.

(c) Unless formal notice as required in subdivision (b) is timely received by the Secretary of State, he or she may have the name of the party omitted from any list, notice, ballot, or other publication containing the names of the parties qualified or seeking qualification that the Secretary of State may cause to be printed or published.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 8001, this section shall only be applicable to a party that has successfully obtained that status for the first time after having been a political body, and shall not apply to a political party that has been disqualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 8.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5153.

Whenever the registration of any party that qualified in the previous general election falls below one-fifteenth of 1 percent of the total state registration, that party shall not be qualified to participate in a presidential general election but shall be deemed to have been abandoned by the voters. The Secretary of State shall immediately remove the name of the party from any list, notice, ballot, or other publication containing the names of the parties qualified to participate in a presidential general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 8.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5154.

No party shall be recognized or qualified to participate in a presidential general election that either directly or indirectly carries on, advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets the overthrow by any unlawful means of, or that directly or indirectly carries on, advocates, teaches, justifies, aids, or abets a program of sabotage, force and violence, sedition or treason against, the government of the United States or of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 511, Sec. 8.   (AB 1419)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Disqualification of Political Parties [5200. - 5200.]

5200.

(a) Not less than 123 days before a primary or presidential general election, the Secretary of State shall, with the advice and consent of the Attorney General, determine which parties are disqualified to participate in any primary election under Section 5102 or a presidential general election under Section 5154. If it is proposed to disqualify a party that was qualified to participate in the next preceding direct primary, notice of intention to disqualify shall be served by certified mail on the chairperson of the state central committee of the party, as shown by the records of the Secretary of State. In any event, notice of intention to disqualify shall be given in each county of the state by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed and published in any
 county, publication shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in an adjoining county.

(b) If the party desires a hearing on the notice of intention to disqualify, it shall, within 10 days after service by mail or within 10 days after the last date upon which the notice was published in any county, whichever is later, file an affidavit in the Supreme Court pursuant to Section 13314 setting forth facts showing that the political party is not disqualified to participate in any primary election under Section 5102 or a presidential general election under Section 5154. If the party does not file the affidavit within the time specified, the notice of intention to disqualify shall constitute final disqualification. Before the affidavit is filed, a copy shall be personally served on the Secretary of State. When filed, the matter shall be set for return in not more than 10 days and shall have priority over any other
 pending cases.

(c) In connection with proceedings in the Supreme Court under this section, the Legislature hereby declares its intent to create a speedy and expeditious method for judicial determination of the vital questions involved, and urges the Supreme Court to accept jurisdiction in any such proceeding. The Legislature further urges that the court instruct any referee before whom the taking of evidence is ordered to report back to the court in sufficient time so that the court’s final order may be made effective on or before the 80th day before the primary or presidential general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 2.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. PRESIDENTIAL ELECTIONS [6000. - 6954.]



PART 1. PARTISAN PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARIES [6000. - 6884.]



  CHAPTER 0.5. General Provisions [6000. - 6000.2.]

6000.

All references to a voter’s or candidate’s party “registration” or “affiliation” in this part shall refer to the party preference or lack of party preference disclosed by the voter or candidate in accordance with Sections 2151 and 2152 and subdivision (b) of Section 2154.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 13.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6000.1.

“Generally advocated for or recognized candidate” or “recognized candidate” means an individual who has an authorized campaign committee registered with the Federal Election Commission for the office of President of the United States and submits proof, pursuant to Section 6000.2, of at least one of the following criteria:

(a) The candidate is qualified for funding under the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1974 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 30101 et seq.).

(b) The candidate has appeared as a candidate in a national presidential debate hosted by a political party qualified to participate in a primary election, with at least two participating candidates, which is publicly available for viewing by voters in more than one state during the current presidential election cycle. For purposes of this subdivision, “political party qualified to participate in a primary election” means any political party qualified in California, a major or minor ballot-qualified political party in another state, or a national committee of a political party recognized by the Federal Election Commission.

(c) The candidate
 has been placed or has qualified for placement on a presidential primary ballot or a caucus ballot of a major or minor ballot-qualified political party in at least one other state in the current presidential election cycle.

(d) The candidate has been or has qualified to be a candidate in a caucus of a major or minor ballot-qualified political party in at least one other state in the current presidential election cycle.

(e) The candidate has all of the
 following:

(1) A current presidential campaign internet website or webpage hosted by the candidate or a qualified political party.

(2) A written request submitted on the candidate’s behalf to the Secretary of State requesting that the candidate be placed on the presidential primary ballot. The written request shall be from a party qualified to participate in a primary election, as set forth in Section
 5100.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 1.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6000.2.

(a) A candidate for the office of the President of the United States shall provide to the Secretary of State proof, in substantially the following form, of meeting at least one of the criteria set forth in Section 6000.1:

GENERALLY ADVOCATED FOR OR RECOGNIZED CANDIDATE______, a candidate for the office of the President of the United States of America, is a generally advocated for or recognized candidate, as defined in Section 6000.1 of the Elections Code, and has met at least one of the following criteria:◻The candidate is
 qualified for funding under the Federal Election Campaign Act of 1974 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 30101, et seq.). Attach supporting documentation and provide a description: ______◻The candidate has appeared as a candidate in a national presidential debate hosted by a political party qualified to participate in a primary election, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6000.1 of the Elections Code, with at least two participating candidates, which is publicly available for viewing by voters in more than one state during the current presidential election cycle. Attach supporting documentation and provide a description:______◻The candidate has been placed or has qualified for placement on a presidential primary ballot or a caucus
 ballot of a major or minor ballot-qualified political party in at least one other state in the current presidential election cycle. Attach supporting documentation and provide a description:______◻The candidate has been or has qualified to be a candidate in a caucus of a major or minor ballot-qualified political party in at least one other state in the current presidential election cycle. Attach supporting documentation and provide a description: ______◻The candidate has all of the following (attach documentation and provide a description for each item):(1) A current
 presidential campaign internet website or webpage hosted by the candidate or a qualified political party.(2) A written request submitted on the candidate’s behalf to the Secretary of State requesting that the candidate be placed on the presidential primary ballot. The written request is from a party qualified to participate in a primary election, as set forth in Section 5100 of the Elections Code.Dated this ____ day of ______, 20__._____________________________Signature of candidate

(b) The candidate shall file the form set forth in subdivision (a) and any attached supporting documentation with the Secretary of State and specify the California qualified political party ballot on which the candidate seeks to appear on or before the 98th day before the presidential primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 108.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1. Democratic Presidential Primary [6001. - 6241.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6001. - 6003.]

6001.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Alquist Open Presidential Primary Act.”

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6000a by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 3.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6001.5.

This chapter applies to the Democratic Party.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6001 by Stats. 2019, Ch. 149, Sec. 4.   (SB 505)   Effective July 30, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

6002.

(a) This chapter applies both to the selection of delegates and alternates pledged to the candidacy of a particular candidate and to the selection of delegates and alternates not expressing a preference for a particular candidate.

(b) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, the elements and practices to select delegates and alternates
 shall be the same as set forth in the standing rules and bylaws of the Democratic National Committee and the Democratic Party of California, including the following:

(1) The form and timeline for any required statement of candidacy for delegate candidates.

(2) The identification of the presidential preference of delegate candidates.

(3) The schedule for, conduct of, and type of districts used to organize, caucuses for the selection of district delegate and alternate candidates.

(4) The selection of delegates and alternates other than those elected based on the results of district caucuses.

(5) The allocation of delegates and alternates to presidential preferences based on the results of
 the primary election.

(6) Any other goals relating to the composition of the delegation.

(c) The Democratic Party of California shall post any standing rules and bylaws relating to this chapter on its Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 1.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6003.

Participation in the delegate selection process in primaries shall be restricted to voters whose affidavits of registration declare the Democratic Party as their party affiliation and any other voter authorized under subdivision (c) of Section 13102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 190, Sec. 2.   (AB 1689)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Number and Certification of Delegates and Alternates [6020. - 6024.]

6020.

(a) The Chairperson of the Democratic State Central Committee shall notify the Secretary of State on or before the 120th day preceding the presidential primary as to the number of delegates and alternates to represent the state in the next national convention of the Democratic Party.

(b) The chairperson shall also notify the Secretary of State